Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle E. Indemnification.

§79-4-8.50.
Subarticle definitions.

In this subarticle:

“Corporation” includes any domestic or foreign predecessor entity of a corporation in a merger.

“Director” or “officer” means an individual who is or was a director or officer, respectively, of a corporation or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another entity or employee benefit plan. A director or officer is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if the individual’s duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the individual to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” or “officer” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director or officer.

“Expenses” means reasonable expenses of any kind that are incurred in connection with a matter.

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan), or reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding.

“Official capacity” means: (i) when used with respect to a director, the office of director in a corporation; and (ii) when used with respect to an officer, as contemplated in Section 79-4-8.56, the office in a corporation held by the officer. “Official capacity” does not include service for any other domestic or foreign corporation or any partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other entity.

“Party” means an individual who was, is, or is threatened to be made a defendant or respondent in a proceeding.

“Proceeding” means any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, arbitrative or investigative and whether formal or informal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.50; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 3; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 5; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 22, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment repealed former (3), which read: “(3) ‘Disinterested director’ means a director who, at the time of a vote referred to in Section 79-4-8.53(c) or a vote or selection referred to in Section 79-4-8.55(b) or (c), is not: (i) A party to the proceeding; or
(ii) An individual having a familial, financial, professional or employment relationship with the director whose indemnification or advance for expenses is the subject of the decision being made, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the director’s judgment when voting on the decision being made.”; redesignated former (4) through (8) as present (3) through (7); and made gender neutralization changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the first sentence in (2); and rewrote (3).

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Attorneys’ fees: cost of services provided by paralegals or the like as compensable element of award in state court.
73 A.L.R.4th 938.

§79-4-8.51.
Authority to indemnify.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a corporation may indemnify an individual who is a party to a proceeding because he is a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

He conducted himself in good faith; and

He reasonably believed:

In the case of conduct in his official capacity, that his conduct was in the best interests of the corporation; and

In all other cases, that his conduct was at least not opposed to the best interests of the corporation; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, he had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful; or

He engaged in conduct for which broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory under a provision of the articles of incorporation as authorized by Section 79-4-2.02(b)(5).

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose he reasonably believed to be in the interest of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subsection (a)(1)(ii)(B).

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the relevant standard of conduct described in this section.

Unless ordered by a court under Section 79-4-8.54(a)(3), a corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, except for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding if it is determined that the director has met the relevant standard of conduct under subsection (a); or

In connection with any proceeding with respect to conduct for which he was adjudged liable on the basis that he received a financial benefit to which he was not entitled, whether or not involving action in his official capacity.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.51; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (a)(2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by inserting the word “for” following “He engaged in conduct...” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Corporation’s authority to pay for or reimburse reasonable expenses incurred by director who was party to proceeding in advance of final disposition, see § 79-4-8.53.

Court-ordered indemnification of director, see § 79-4-8.54.

Determination of and authorization for indemnification, see § 79-4-8.55.

Authority for corporation to purchase indemnification insurance to cover situations not covered by §§ 79-4-8.51 or 79-4-8.52, see § 79-4-8.57.

Requirement that corporation report to shareholders if corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to director under this section, see § 79-4-16.21.

Indemnification of nonprofit corporation director officer, employee or agent, see § 79-11-281.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1644 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1141.

19 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 1063, 1230-1232.

§79-4-8.52.
Mandatory indemnification.

A corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which he was a party because he was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by him in connection with the proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.52; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 5, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

Court-ordered indemnification of director, see § 79-4-8.54.

Mandatory indemnification of officers of corporation who are not directors, see § 79-4-8.56.

Authority for corporation to purchase indemnification insurance to cover situations not covered by §§ 79-4-8.51 or 79-4-8.52, see § 79-4-8.57.

Requirement that corporation report to shareholders if corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to director under this section, see § 79-4-16.21.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1654.

§79-4-8.53.
Advance for expenses.

A corporation may, before final disposition of a proceeding, advance funds to pay for or reimburse the reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding by an individual who is a party to the proceeding because that individual is a member of the board of directors if the director delivers to the corporation:

A signed written affirmation of the director’s good faith belief that the relevant standard of conduct described in Section 79-4-8.51 has been met by the director or that the proceeding involves conduct for which liability has been eliminated under a provision of the articles of incorporation as authorized by Section 79-4-2.02(b)(4); and

A signed written undertaking of the director to repay any funds advanced if the director is not entitled to mandatory indemnification under Section 79-4-8.52 and it is ultimately determined under Section 79-4-8.54 or Section 79-4-8.55 that the director has not met the relevant standard of conduct described in Section 79-4-8.51.

The undertaking required by subsection (a)(2) must be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to the financial ability of the director to make repayment.

Authorizations under this section shall be made:

By the board of directors:

If there are two (2) or more qualified directors, by a majority vote of all the qualified directors (a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum) or by a majority of the members of a committee of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote; or

If there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, by the vote necessary for action by the board in accordance with Section 79-4-8.24(c), in which authorization directors who are not qualified directors may participate; or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a qualified director may not be voted on the authorization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.53; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 6; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 6; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 23, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment rewrote the introductory paragraph of (a); substituted “written affirmation of the director’s good faith belief that the relevant standard of conduct described in Section 79-4-8.51 has been met by the director” for “written affirmation of his good faith belief that he has met the relevant standard of conduct described in Section 79-4-8.51” in (a)(1);
substituted “A written undertaking of the director to repay any funds advanced if the director is not entitled” for “His written undertaking, to repay any funds advanced if he is not entitled” in (a)(2); in (c), deleted “in the manner specified in Section 79-4-8.55” from the end of the introductory paragraph, substituted “directors who are not qualified directors” for “directors who do not qualify as disinterested directors” near the end of (1)(ii), substituted “director who at the time is not a qualified director” for “director who at the time does not qualify as a disinterested director” in (2) and substituted “qualified directors” for “disinterested directors” throughout; and made gender neutralization changes.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added “signed” preceding “written” at the beginning of (a)(1) and (2).

Qualified director defined, see § 79-4-1.43.

Court ordered advance for expenses, see § 79-4-8.54.

Indemnification of nonprofit corporation director, officer, employee, agent, see § 79-11-281.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Insurance: construction of policy or bond indemnifying directors or officers of corporation for expenses incurred in defending actions brought against them in their capacity as such. 49 A.L.R.3d 1250.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1651.

§79-4-8.54.
Court-ordered indemnification.

A director who is a party to a proceeding because he is a director may apply for indemnification or an advance for expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After receipt of an application, and after giving any notice it considers necessary, the court shall:

Order indemnification if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under Section 79-4-8.52;

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses pursuant to a provision authorized by Section 79-4-8.58(a); or

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines, in view of all the relevant circumstances, that it is fair and reasonable:

To indemnify the director; or

To advance expenses to the director, even if he has not met the relevant standard of conduct set forth in Section 79-4-8.51(a), failed to comply with Section 79-4-8.53 or was adjudged liable in a proceeding referred to in subsection 79-4-8.51(d)(1) or (d)(2), but if he was adjudged so liable his indemnification shall be limited to reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification under subsection (a)(1) or to indemnification or advance for expenses under subsection (a)(2), it shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s reasonable expenses incurred in connection with obtaining court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses. If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under subsection (a)(3), it may also order the corporation to pay the director’s reasonable expenses to obtain court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.54; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 7, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

Exceptions to indemnification of director under § 79-4-8.51 unless ordered by a court under subsection (a)(3) of this section, see § 79-4-8.51.

Advance for expenses, see § 79-4-8.53.

Court-ordered indemnification of officer of corporation who is not a director, see § 79-4-8.56.

Requirement that corporation report to shareholders if corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to director under this section, see § 79-4-16.21.

Indemnification of nonprofit corporation director, officer, employee, agent, see § 79-11-281.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Power of court, in absence of statute, to require corporate surety on fiduciary bond in probate proceeding. 82 A.L.R.2d 926.

Causes of action governed by limitations period in
UCC § 2-725.
49 A.L.R.5th 1.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1650.

§79-4-8.55.
Determination and authorization of indemnification.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under Section 79-4-8.51 unless authorized for a specific proceeding after a determination has been made that indemnification is permissible because the director has met the relevant standard of conduct set forth in Section 79-4-8.51.

The determination shall be made:

If there are two (2) or more qualified directors, by the board of directors by a majority vote of all the qualified directors (a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum), or by a majority of the members of a committee of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote;

By special legal counsel:

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a qualified director may not be voted on the determination.

Selected in the manner prescribed in subdivision (1); or

If there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, selected by the board of directors (in which selection directors who are not qualified directors may participate); or

Authorization of indemnification shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, or if the determination is made by special legal counsel, authorization of indemnification shall be made by those entitled to select special legal counsel under subsection (b)(2)(ii).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.55; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 429, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

The 2006 amendment substituted “indemnification is permissible because the director” for “indemnification of the director is permissible because he” in (a); in (b)(2)(ii), substituted “selected by the board of directors (in which selection directors who are not qualified” for “elected by the board of directors (in which selection directors who do not qualify as”; in (b)(3), substituted “director who at the time is not a” for “director who at the time does not qualify as a”; rewrote (c); and substituted “qualified director” and “qualified directors” for “disinterested director” and “disinterested directors” throughout.

Qualified director defined, see § 79-4-1.43.

Applicability of this section to payment of expenses to director in advance of final disposition of proceeding, see § 79-4-8.53.

Applicability of this section to determinations of further indemnity, see § 79-4-8.58.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Right of corporation to indemnity for civil or criminal liability incurred by employee’s violation of antitrust laws. 37 A.L.R.3d 1355.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1644 et seq.

§79-4-8.56.
Indemnification of officers.

A corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under this subarticle to an officer of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding because he is an officer of the corporation:

To the same extent as to a director; and

If he is an officer but not a director, to such further extent as may be provided by the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, a resolution of the board of directors or contract except for (A) liability in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation other than for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding or (B) liability arising out of conduct that constitutes (i) receipt by him of a financial benefit to which he is not entitled, (ii) an intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders, or (iii) an intentional violation of criminal law.

The provisions of subsection (a)(2) shall apply to an officer who is also a director if the basis on which he is made a party to the proceeding is an act or omission solely as an officer.

An officer of a corporation who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under Section 79-4-8.52, and may apply to a court under Section 79-4-8.54 for indemnification or an advance for expenses, in each case to the same extent to which a director may be entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under those provisions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.56; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 9, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a publishing error in the section heading. The words “employees and agents” were deleted from the end. The Joint Committee ratified the correction at its May 16, 2002 meeting.

Definition of “official capacity”, see § 79-4-8.50.

Indemnification of nonprofit corporation director, officer, employee, agent, see § 79-11-281.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Who is “executive officer” of insured within liability insurance policy. 1 A.L.R.5th 132.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 1644 et seq.

6A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1141.

§79-4-8.57.
Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is a director or officer of the corporation, or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, serves at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by him in that capacity or arising from his status as a director or officer, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to him against the same liability under this subarticle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.57; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 10, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

Insurance: construction of policy or bond indemnifying directors or officers of corporation for expenses incurred in defending actions brought against them in their capacity as such. 49 A.L.R.3d 1250.

Who is “executive officer” of insured within liability insurance policy. 1 A.L.R.5th 132.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 1649.

§79-4-8.58.
Application of subarticle.

A corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or in a resolution adopted or a contract approved by its board of directors or shareholders, obligate itself in advance of the act or omission giving rise to a proceeding to provide indemnification in accordance with Section 79-4-8.51 or advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with Section 79-4-8.53. Any such provision that obligates the corporation to provide indemnification to the fullest extent permitted by law shall be deemed to obligate the corporation to advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with Section 79-4-8.53 to the fullest extent permitted by law, unless the provision specifically provides otherwise.

A right of indemnification or to advances for expenses created by this subarticle or under subsection (a) that is in effect at the time of an act or omission shall not be eliminated or impaired with respect to the act or omission by an amendment of the articles of incorporation or bylaws or a resolution of the directors or shareholders adopted after the occurrence of the act or omission, unless, in the case of a right created under subsection (a), the provision creating the right that is in effect at the time of the act or omission explicitly authorizes elimination or impairment after the act or omission has occurred.

Any provision pursuant to subsection (a) shall not obligate the corporation to indemnify or advance expenses to a director of a predecessor of the corporation, pertaining to conduct with respect to the predecessor, unless otherwise specifically provided. Any provision for indemnification or advance for expenses in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders of a predecessor of the corporation in a merger or in a contract to which the predecessor is a party, existing at the time the merger takes effect, shall be governed by Section 79-4-11.06(a)(3).

Subject to subsection (b), a corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation, limit any of the rights to indemnification or advance for expenses created by or pursuant to this subarticle.

This subarticle does not limit a corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director or an officer in connection with his appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he is not a party.

This subarticle does not limit a corporation’s power to indemnify, advance expenses to or provide or maintain insurance on behalf of an employee or agent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 8.58; Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 11; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 24, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, added (b); and redesignated former (b) through (e) as (c) through (f); and added “Subject to subsection (b)” to the beginning of (d).

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.

§79-4-8.59.
Subarticle to be controlling.

A corporation may provide indemnification or advance expenses to a director or an officer only as permitted by this subarticle.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 459, § 12, eff from and after January 1, 1997.

Indemnification of directors, officers, employees, agents under Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, see § 79-11-281.